District of Columbia statutes.
34-1503

Competitive billing.

(a)

Competitive billing shall begin on the initial implementation date and shall be implemented according to a schedule to be determined by the Commission. The Commission shall have the discretion to implement competitive billing for all customers on a single date.

(b)

This section shall not preclude the Commission from including competitive billing as a part of any pilot program established by the Commission.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 103, 47 DCR 1091

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1504.